Illinois, session 104th, SB2933.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-1001 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/1-1001)  (from Ch. 34, par. 1-1001)7    Sec. 1-1001. Short title. This Act shall be known and and 8may be cited as the Counties Code.9(Source: P.A. 97-1154, eff. 1-25-13.)